District of Columbia statutes.
38-356

Complaint resolution services.

(a)

The Office of Ombudsman shall provide complaint resolution services, which shall be available to current and prospective public school students and their parents or guardians.

(b)

Participation in complaint resolution services provided by the Office of Ombudsman shall be voluntary.

(c)

Before submitting a complaint to the Office of Ombudsman, the complainant shall make reasonable efforts to resolve the issue at the school level.

(d)

Complainants may submit complaints by phone, in writing, or electronically.

(e)

The Office of Ombudsman shall review and investigate each complaint and shall do one or more of the following:

(1)

Resolve the complaint;

(2)

Refer the complainant to another agency or department;

(3)

Require the complainant to submit documentation to support the complaint;

(4)

Provide an opportunity for the complainant to meet with the subject of the complaint;

(5)

Conduct mediation proceedings;

(6)

Dismiss the complaint as unfounded; or

(7)

Take any other action determined necessary and appropriate by the Ombudsman.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 606a
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-76, § 102(e), 61 DCR 39
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-76 added this section.